District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.16

Other prohibited acts.

A person that, in order to obtain a financial gain, intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or obliterates a document of gift, an amendment or revocation of a document of gift, or a refusal commits a felony and upon conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $50,000, imprisonment not exceeding 5 years, or both.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 17, 55 DCR 2532

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 17 of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (2006).

Editor's Notes